Maryland, session 2025, SB0633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(ff) “Political action committee” means a political committee that is not:
(1) a political party;
(2) a central committee;
(3) a slate;
(4) a legislative party caucus committee;
(5) an authorized candidate campaign committee; or
– 1 –

Ch. 313 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) a ballot issue committee.
13–223.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DISBURSEMENT” MEANS:
(I) AN INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURE FOR CAMPAIGN MATERIAL
THAT IS A PUBLIC COMMUNICATION, AS DEFINED IN § 13–306 OF THIS TITLE;
(II) A DISBURSEMENT FOR ELECTIONEERING
COMMUNICATIONS, AS DEFINED IN § 13–307 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(III) A POLITICAL DISBURSEMENT, AS DEFINED IN § 13–309.2 OF
THIS TITLE.
(3) “DONATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 13–306, § 13–307,
OR § 13–309.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(4) “SOLICITATION” MEANS A REQUEST FOR CONTRIBUTIONS OR
DONATIONS TO A PERSON DISSEMINATED THROUGH ANY MEDIUM.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO:
(1) A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE REPORTS UNDER § 13–306, §
13–307, OR § 13–309.2 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(2) A POLITICAL ACTION COMMITTEE THAT:
(I) IS NOT AFFILIATED WITH A CORPORATION OR LABOR
ORGANIZATION; AND
(II) EXCLUSIVELY MAKES INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURES OR
DISBURSEMENTS FOR ELECTIONEERING COMMUNICATIONS.
(C) IF A PERSON SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SOLICITS FOR THE BENEFIT OF
A CANDIDATE OR A POLITICAL PARTY AND USES A CANDIDATE’S NAME, IMAGE, OR
LIKENESS IN THE SOLICITATION, THE PERSON SHALL CLEARLY AND
CONSPICUOUSLY INCLUDE ON THE SOLICITATION THE FOLLOWING DISCLAIMER OR
A SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR DISCLAIMER: “THE (NAME, IMAGE, OR LIKENESS) OF
(NAME OF CANDIDATE OR POLITICAL PARTY) ON THIS SOLICITATION IS INCLUDED
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 313
WITHOUT THE KNOWLEDGE OR PERMISSION OF (NAME OF CANDIDATE OR POLITICAL
PARTY), AND DOES NOT IMPLY AUTHORIZATION OR APPROVAL BY (NAME OF
CANDIDATE OR POLITICAL PARTY).”.
(D) IF A PERSON SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SOLICITS FOR WHAT APPEARS
TO BE A CHARITABLE AN ELECTORAL OR A POLITICAL PURPOSE, THE PERSON SHALL
INCLUDE DISCLOSE IN A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS MANNER ON EACH
SOLICITATION DISSEMINATED BY THE PERSON A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS
STATEMENT THAT CONTRIBUTIONS OR DONATIONS TO THE PERSON:
(1) ARE NOT NECESSARILY USED FOR CHARITABLE PURPOSES THE
FIVE RECIPIENTS TO WHICH THE PERSON MADE THE LARGEST EXPENDITURES OR
DISBURSEMENTS DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR QUARTER;
AND
(2) ARE NOT TAX–DEDUCTIBLE THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
EXPENDITURES OR DISBURSEMENTS MADE TO EACH RECIPIENT.
(E) (1) THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR, OR THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR’S
DESIGNEE, MAY INVESTIGATE A POTENTIAL VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR, OR THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR’S
DESIGNEE, SHALL:
(I) NOTIFY A PERSON WHO IS SUBJECT TO AN INVESTIGATION
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION OF THE CIRCUMSTANCES THAT GAVE RISE TO THE
INVESTIGATION; AND
(II) PROVIDE THE PERSON AMPLE OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD
AT A PUBLIC MEETING OF THE STATE BOARD.
(3) (I) IN FURTHERANCE OF AN INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR, OR THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR’S
DESIGNEE, MAY ISSUE A SUBPOENA FOR THE ATTENDANCE OF A WITNESS TO
TESTIFY OR THE PRODUCTION OF RECORDS.
(II) A SUBPOENA ISSUED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
SERVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND RULES.
(III) FOR A SUBPOENA TO BE ISSUED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH,
THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL MAKE A FINDING THAT THE SUBPOENA IS
NECESSARY TO AND IN FURTHERANCE OF AN INVESTIGATION BEING CONDUCTED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
– 3 –

Ch. 313 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) A FILING SUBMITTED TO A COURT WITH RESPECT TO A
SUBPOENA UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE SEALED ON FILING.
(V) IF A PERSON FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A SUBPOENA ISSUED
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, ON PETITION OF THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR, A CIRCUIT
COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION MAY COMPEL COMPLIANCE WITH THE
SUBPOENA.
(4) AT THE CONCLUSION OF THE INVESTIGATION AND FOLLOWING
THE HEARING UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE STATE BOARD
SHALL ISSUE A PUBLIC REPORT OF ITS FINDINGS AND MAY:
(I) PROHIBIT A PERSON WHO VIOLATED THIS SECTION FROM
SOLICITING CONTRIBUTIONS OR DONATIONS FOR A PERIOD OF TIME DETERMINED
BY THE STATE BOARD; OR
(II) IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY ON A PERSON WHO VIOLATED THIS
SECTION AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS NOT SUBJECT TO:
(I) A CRIMINAL PENALTY UNDER § 13–603 OF THIS TITLE;
(II) A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER § 13–604 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(III) INVESTIGATION BY THE STATE PROSECUTOR.
(2) THE STATE BOARD MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY FOR A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(3) A CIVIL PENALTY:
(I) SHALL BE ASSESSED IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED IN §
13–604.1 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(II) MAY NOT EXCEED $10,000.
(G) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –